fst/lexc/git_nouns.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+N
+VOC
-T
-ATTR
-VAL

LEXICON Noun
+N: 	NDeriv ;

LEXICON NDeriv
-T:^T		SeriesII ;
-VAL:^xw	SeriesII ;
-VAL:^xw	SX ;
			Resemb ;
			NInfl ;

LEXICON NInfl
-ATTR:^m	# ;
-ATTR:^a	# ;
		SeriesII ;
		SX ;
		Word ;

LEXICON AddressForm
+VOC: Word ;
